Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4920.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 17033. (1) Notwithstanding the requirements of part 161, the board may require a licensee seeking renewal of a license to furnish the board with satisfactory evidence that, during the 3 years immediately preceding application for renewal, the licensee has attended continuing education courses or programs approved by the board totaling not less than 150 hours the following in subjects related to the practice of medicine including, but not limited to, medical ethics and designed to further educate licensees: (a) Until December 31, 2026, not less than 150 hours. (b) Beginning January 1, 2027, not less than 120 hours. (2) As required under section 16204, the board shall promulgate rules requiring each applicant for license renewal to complete as part of the continuing education requirement of subsection (1) an appropriate number of hours or courses in pain and symptom management. Sec. 17533. (1) Notwithstanding the requirements of part 161, the board may require a licensee seeking renewal of a license to furnish the board with satisfactory evidence that, during the 3 years immediately preceding an application for renewal, the licensee has attended continuing education courses or programs approved by the board and totaling not less than 150 hours the following in subjects related to the practice of osteopathic medicine and surgery and designed to further educate licensees: (a) Until December 31, 2026, not less than 150 hours. (b) Beginning January 1, 2027, not less than 120 hours. (2) As required under section 16204, the board shall promulgate rules requiring each applicant for license renewal to complete as part of the continuing education requirement of subsection (1) an appropriate number of hours or courses in pain and symptom management. Sec. 18033. (1) Notwithstanding the requirements of part 161, the board may require a licensee seeking renewal of a license to furnish the board with satisfactory evidence that, during the 3 years immediately preceding application for renewal, the licensee has attended continuing education courses or programs approved by the board and totaling not less than 150 hours the following in subjects related to the practice of podiatric medicine and surgery and designed to further educate licensees: (a) Until December 31, 2026, not less than 150 hours. (b) Beginning January 1, 2027, not less than 120 hours. (2) As required under section 16204, the board shall promulgate rules requiring each applicant for license renewal to complete as part of the continuing education requirement of subsection (1) an appropriate number of hours or courses in pain and symptom management.